South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4699.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 13, Chapter 13, Title 8 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 8-13-1357. In addition to all other requirements of this chapter, a candidate for public office must file proof of current compliance with all state and federal income tax filing requirements at the same time the candidate files his statement of economic interests pursuant to Section 8-13-1356. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----